Mississippi statutes. Title 77. Public Utilities and Carriers
Article 1. Certificates of Public Convenience and Necessity; Rates; Service.
§ 77-3-53.
Certified copies of documents and orders as evidence.

Copies of official documents and orders filed or deposited according to law in the office of the commission, certified by a commissioner or by the secretary under the official seal of the commission to be true copies of the original shall be evidence in like manner as the originals, in all matters before the commission and in the courts of this state, or any other state or jurisdiction.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7716-18; Laws, 1956, ch. 372, § 18.

§ 77-3-55.
Orders, findings, authorizations and certificates to be in writing and entered in minutes.

Every order, finding, authorization or certificate issued or approved by the commission under any provisions of this article shall be in writing and entered on the minutes of the commission. A certificate under the seal of the commission that any such order, finding, authorization or certificate has not been modified, stayed, suspended or revoked, shall be received as evidence in any proceeding as to the facts therein stated.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7716-19; Laws, 1956, ch. 372, § 19.

§ 77-3-57.
Service on parties.

Service in all hearings, investigations and proceedings pending before the commission shall be made personally in the manner in which process is required by law to be served or by registered or certified mail, as the commission may direct.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7716-21; Laws, 1956, ch. 372, § 21.

§ 77-3-59.
Decisions; compliance with orders.

The commission shall make and file its findings and order, and its opinion, if any. All findings shall be supported by substantial evidence presented and shall be in sufficient detail to enable the court on appeal to determine the controverted questions presented, and the basis of the commission’s conclusion. A copy of such order certified under the seal of the commission, shall be served upon the person against whom it runs, or his attorney, and notice thereof shall be given to the other parties to the proceedings or their attorneys. Said order shall take effect twenty (20) days after the service thereof, unless otherwise provided, and shall continue in force, either for a period which may be designated therein or until changed or revoked by the commission. If an order cannot, in the judgment of the commission, be complied with within twenty (20) days, the commission may grant and prescribe such additional time as in its judgment is reasonably necessary to comply with the order, and may, on application and for good cause shown, extend the time for compliance fixed in its order.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7716-22; Laws, 1956, ch. 372, § 22; Laws, 1992, ch. 417, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved April 29, 1992).

§ 77-3-61.
Alteration of orders.

The commission may at any time, after notice, and after opportunity to be heard as provided in Section 77-3-47, rescind or amend any order or decision made by it. Any order rescinding or amending a prior order or decision shall, when served upon the utility affected and after notice thereof is given to the other parties to the proceedings, have the same effect as original orders or decisions. However, no such order shall affect the legality or validity of any acts done by said utility before service upon it of the notice of such change.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7716-23; Laws, 1956, ch. 372, § 23.

§ 77-3-63.
Record of proceedings; reporter.

A full and complete record shall be kept of all proceedings had before the commission or any commissioner or any formal hearing. All testimony shall be taken down by a reporter appointed by the commission, whose qualifications and compensations shall be the same as now provided by law for the circuit and chancery court reporters.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7716-24; Laws, 1956, ch. 372, § 24.

§ 77-3-65.
Rehearing; stay of order.

After an order or decision has been made by the commission, any party to the proceedings may, within thirty (30) days after the entry of the order or decision, apply for a rehearing in respect of any matters determined in said proceedings and specified in the application for rehearing, and the commission may grant and hold such rehearings on such matters.

The filing of an application for rehearing shall not stay or suspend the effective date of any commission order or the obligation of any person to comply in all respects with such order unless the commission shall, in the exercise of its discretion, stay, suspend or modify such order. Any party to the proceedings shall be entitled to a stay of the order, other than an order resulting from a proceeding under Section 77-3-39, as a matter of right, upon filing with the commission a bond payable to the State of Mississippi in such amount and with sufficient surety, both as determined by the commission, to insure the prompt payment of any damages or refunds to the party or persons entitled thereto, if the order shall, at the conclusion of any subsequent proceedings, become effective. Such damages or refunds shall be paid in full, including interest at the same rate prescribed in Section 77-3-39, Section 77-3-69 and Section 77-3-71. In lieu of payment, the utility may credit the service account with the amount due under this section if the consumer entitled to the damages or refund is, at that time, a consumer of the utility.

The commission shall either grant or refuse an application for rehearing within twenty (20) days after the date of application therefor. A failure by the commission to act upon such application within that period shall be deemed refusal thereof. If the application is granted, the commission shall conduct and conclude a rehearing within thirty (30) days of the entry of the order for rehearing and shall enter a new order after the rehearing shall have been concluded, which shall become effective ten (10) days after such order is entered, unless otherwise provided by the commission for reasonable cause.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7716-25; Laws, 1956, ch. 372, § 25; Laws, 1983, ch. 467, § 24; Laws, 1987, ch. 312, eff from and after July 1, 1987.

§ 77-3-67.
Appeals to chancery court.

In addition to other remedies now available at law or in equity, any party aggrieved by any final finding, order or judgment of the commission, except those final findings, orders or judgments specified in Section 77-3-72, shall have the right, regardless of the amount involved, of appeal to the chancery court of the judicial district in which the principal place of business of the utility in the state of Mississippi is located. If the court shall find that the appeal has been to the improper venue then the cause shall not be dismissed for such reason but shall be transferred to such proper venue. If an application for rehearing has been filed, an appeal must be filed within thirty (30) days after the application for rehearing has been refused or deemed refused because of the commission’s failure to act thereon within the time specified in Section 77-3-65 or, if the application is granted, within thirty (30) days after the rendition of the decision on rehearing. If an application for rehearing has not been filed, an appeal must be filed within thirty (30) days after the entry of the commission’s order. Every appeal shall state briefly the nature of the proceedings before the commission, and shall specify the order complained of. Any person whose rights may be directly affected by said appeal may appear and become a party, or the court may upon proper notice order any person to be joined as a party.

Upon the filing of an appeal the clerk of the chancery court shall serve notice thereof upon the commission, whereupon the commission shall, within sixty (60) days (or within such additional time as the court may for cause allow) from the service of such notice, certify to the chancery court the record in the case, which record shall include a transcript of all testimony, together with all exhibits or copies thereof, all pleadings, proceedings, orders, findings and opinions entered in the case. However, the parties and the commission may stipulate that a specified portion only of the record shall be certified to the court as the record on appeal.

No new or additional evidence shall be introduced in the chancery court but the case shall be determined upon the record and evidence transferred.

The court may hear and dispose of the appeal in termtime or vacation and the court may sustain or dismiss the appeal, modify or vacate the order complained of in whole or in part, as the case may be. In case the order is wholly or partly vacated the court may also, in its discretion, remand the matter to the commission for such further proceedings, not inconsistent with the court’s order as, in the opinion of the court, justice may require. The order shall not be vacated or set aside either in whole or in part, except for errors of law, unless the court finds that the order of the commission is not supported by substantial evidence, is contrary to the manifest weight of the evidence, is in excess of the statutory authority or jurisdiction of the commission, or violates constitutional rights.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7716-26; Laws, 1956, ch. 372, § 26; Laws, 1978, ch. 507, § 2; Laws, 1983, ch. 467, § 25, eff from and after January 3, 1984. [See Editor’s Note, below].

§ 77-3-69.
Stay of orders pending appeal.

The pendency of proceedings to review shall not of itself stay or suspend the operation of the order of the commission. However, any party may, as a matter of right, secure from the court in which a review of or an appeal from the order of the commission not related to changing rates or rate design is sought, an order suspending or staying the operation of the order of the commission pending a review of such order, by adequately securing the other parties against loss due to the delay in the enforcement of the order in case the order under review is affirmed, the security to be in such form and amount as shall be directed by the court granting the stay or suspension.

If an appeal to the chancery court be taken from an order of the commission reducing existing rates or refusing to approve rates proposed by a utility, the utility, if it is not then collecting under refunding bond rates in excess of rates which have been ordered by the commission, may request upon motion filed in the chancery court an order allowing the utility to place into effect forthwith interim rates which may be charged and collected, subject to refund as hereinafter provided, pending final determination of the rate proceeding. The court may, in its discretion, upon a finding that undue hardship or irreparable injury to the utility or the public interest would probably result otherwise, allow the utility to place into effect such interim rates at a revenue level up to, but not exceeding, the proposed rates. The court may allow the utility to collect all or part of a proposed rate increase. However, before such increased rates can take effect, the utility shall file with the court a bond in a reasonable amount approved by the court, with sureties approved by the court, conditioned upon the refund, with interest at the same rate prescribed in Section 77-3-39, Section 77-3-69 and Section 77-3-71, to the parties entitled thereto, of the amount of the excess if the existing rate or rates or the rate or rates so put into effect are finally determined to be excessive. In lieu of payment, the utility may credit the service account with the amount due under this subsection if the consumer entitled to the refund is, at that time, a consumer of the utility. If the court does not dispose of the motion for interim rates as contemplated herein within thirty (30) days of the filing of such motion, then the public utility, as a matter of right, may place into effect forthwith fifty percent (50%) of that portion of the proposed rate schedule not allowed by the commission’s order, pending final determination of the appeal, upon filing with the court a surety bond in the same manner as previously provided for herein.

If the court does not make a final determination and adjudication of the rate proceeding within one hundred eighty (180) days after the record has been certified and filed, or if the court remands the matter to the commission for further proceedings and the commission has not entered its order allowing rates within forty-five (45) days from the time of receipt of the mandate of the court, or if the commission has at any time entered its order after remand and an appeal therefrom has been taken, then, in any such case, the public utility may, as a matter of right, place into effect the entire proposed rate schedule, under refunding bond, as provided for in this section or in Section 77-3-39, whichever is applicable. Interim rates under refunding bond charged by the utility under this subsection shall terminate upon final disposition of the rate proceeding without timely appeal.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7716-27; Laws, 1956, ch. 372, § 27; Laws, 1983, ch. 467, § 26, eff from and after passage (approved April 6, 1983).

§ 77-3-71.
Appeals to supreme court.

Appeals in accordance with law may be had to the Supreme Court of the State of Mississippi from any final judgment of the chancery court.

If the party taking the appeal has theretofore furnished security as provided in Sections 77-3-39 and 77-3-69, and has filed a bond conditioned as provided in Sections 77-3-39 and 77-3-69, the taking of an appeal to the supreme court shall operate as a supersedeas without the furnishing of further security or bond. In such cases the supreme court may, upon application to it, require such additional security, or such additional bond conditioned as provided in Sections 77-3-39 and 77-3-69, as in its opinion will adequately secure the other party to the appeal, or parties who may become entitled to refunds, against loss in the event the judgment under review is affirmed.

If an appeal to the supreme court be taken from a final judgment of the chancery court which alters an order of the commission by approving a level of revenue in excess of that allowed by the commission’s order, the public utility may, as a matter of right, place such level of revenue which has been so approved by the chancery court in such final judgment into effect, pending final determination of the appeal to the supreme court, upon filing with the supreme court a bond in a reasonable amount approved by such court, with sureties approved by such court, conditioned upon the refund with interest at the lawful rate to the parties entitled thereto, of the amount of the excess if the rates so put into effect are finally determined to be excessive. In lieu of payment, the utility may credit the service account with the amount due under this section if the consumer entitled to the refund, is at that time, a consumer of the utility.

In addition to the foregoing, if an appeal to the supreme court be taken from a final judgment of the chancery court with respect to a proceeding for determination of rates, and the public utility is not then collecting under refunding bond rates in excess of rates which have been ordered by the commission, such utility may request upon motion filed in the supreme court an order allowing the utility to place into effect forthwith interim rates which may be charged and collected, subject to refund as hereinafter provided, pending final determination of the rate proceeding. The court may, in its discretion, upon a hearing by not fewer than three (3) justices and upon a finding that undue hardship or irreparable injury to the utility or the public interest would probably result otherwise, allow the utility to place into effect such interim rates at a revenue level up to, but not exceeding, the proposed rates. The court may allow the utility to collect all or part of a proposed rate increase. However, before such increased rates can take effect, the utility shall file with the court a bond in a reasonable amount approved by the court, with sureties approved by the court, conditioned upon the refund, with interest at the lawful rate, to the parties entitled thereto, of the amount of the excess after the existing rate or rates or the rate or rates so put into effect are finally determined to be excessive. In lieu of payment, the utility may credit the service account with the amount due under this section if the consumer entitled to the refund is, at that time, a consumer of the utility.

If the court does not dispose of the motion for interim rates as contemplated herein within thirty (30) days of the filing of such motion, then the public utility, as a matter of right, may place into effect forthwith fifty percent (50%) of that portion of the proposed rate schedule not allowed by the commission’s order, pending final determination of the appeal, upon filing with the court a surety bond in the same manner as previously provided for herein. If the court does not make a final determination and adjudication of the rate proceeding within one hundred eighty (180) days after the record has been certified and filed, or if the court remands the matter to the commission for further proceedings and the commission has not entered its order allowing rates within forty-five (45) days from the time of receipt of the mandate of the court, or if the commission has at any time entered its order after remand and an appeal therefrom has been taken, then, in any such case, the public utility may, as a matter of right, place into effect the entire proposed rate schedule, under refunding bond, as provided for in this section or in Section 77-3-39, whichever is applicable. Interim rates under refunding bond charged by the utility under this subsection shall terminate upon final disposition of the rate proceeding without timely appeal.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7716-28; Laws, 1956, ch. 372, § 28; Laws, 1983, ch. 467, § 27, eff from and after passage (approved April 6, 1983).

§ 77-3-72.
Direct appeals to supreme court from decisions of public service commission involving filings for rate changes.

Any party aggrieved by any final finding, order or judgment of the commission in any utility rate proceedings involving a filing for a rate change of any public utility as described in Section 77-3-3(d)(i), (d)(ii), or (d)(iii), shall have the right, regardless of the amount involved, of direct appeal to the Mississippi Supreme Court. If an application for rehearing has been filed, an appeal must be filed within thirty (30) days after the application for rehearing has been refused or deemed refused because of the commission’s failure to act thereon within the time specified in Section 77-3-65 or, if the application is granted, within thirty (30) days after the rendition of the decision on rehearing. If an application for rehearing has not been filed, an appeal must be filed within thirty (30) days after the entry of the commission’s order. Every appeal shall state briefly the nature of the proceedings before the commission, and shall specify the order complained of. Any person whose rights may be directly affected by said appeal may appear and become a party or the court may, upon proper notice, order any person to be joined as a party.

Upon the filing of an appeal the clerk of the supreme court shall serve notice thereof upon the commission, whereupon the commission shall, within sixty (60) days (or within such additional time as the court may for cause allow) from the service of such notice, certify to the court the record in the case, which record shall include a transcript of all testimony, together with all exhibits or copies thereof, all pleadings, proceedings, orders, findings and opinions entered in the case. However, the parties and the commission may stipulate that a specified portion only of the record shall be certified to the court as the record on appeal.

Any utility aggrieved by an order of the public service commission with respect to a proceeding before the commission for determination of rates, and which has filed in the supreme court an appeal therefrom pursuant to this chapter, and which is not then collecting under refunding bond rates in excess of rates which have been ordered by the commission, may request upon motion filed in the supreme court an order allowing the utility to place into effect forthwith interim rates which may be charged and collected, subject to refund as hereinafter provided, pending final determination of the rate proceeding. The court may in its discretion, upon a hearing by not fewer than three (3) justices and upon a finding that undue hardship or irreparable injury to the utility or the public interest would probably result otherwise, allow the utility to place into effect such interim rates at a revenue level up to, but not exceeding, the proposed rates. The court may allow the utility to collect all or part of a proposed rate increase. However, before such increased rates can take effect, the utility shall file with the court a bond in a reasonable amount approved by the court, with sureties approved by the court, conditioned upon the refund, with interest at the same rate prescribed in Section 77-3-39, Section 77-3-69 and Section 77-3-71, to the parties entitled thereto, of the amount of the excess if the existing rate or rates or the rate or rates so put into effect are finally determined to be excessive. In lieu of payment, the utility may credit the service account with the amount due under this subsection if the consumer entitled to the refund is, at that time, a consumer of the utility.

If the court does not dispose of the motion for interim rates as contemplated in paragraph (a) of this subsection within thirty (30) days of the filing of such motion, then the public utility, as a matter of right, may place into effect forthwith fifty percent (50%) of that portion of the proposed rate schedule not allowed by the commission’s order, pending final determination of the appeal, upon filing with the court a surety bond in the same manner as provided for in paragraph (a) of this subsection.

If the court does not make a final determination and adjudication of the rate proceeding within one hundred eighty (180) days after the record has been certified and filed, or if the court remands the matter to the commission for further proceedings and the commission has not entered its order allowing rates within forty-five (45) days from the time of receipt of the mandate of the court, or if the commission has at any time entered its order after remand and an appeal therefrom has been taken, then, in any such case, the public utility may, as a matter of right, place into effect the entire proposed rate schedule, under refunding bond, as provided for in this section or in Section 77-3-39, whichever is applicable. Interim rates under refunding bond charged by the utility under this subsection shall terminate upon final disposition of the rate proceeding without timely appeal. The court may hear and dispose of the appeal in termtime or vacation and the court may sustain or dismiss the appeal, modify or vacate the order complained of in whole or in part, as the case may be. In case the order is wholly or partly vacated the court may also, in its discretion, remand the matter to the commission for such further proceedings, not inconsistent with the court’s order as, in the opinion of the court, justice may require. The order shall not be vacated or set aside either in whole or in part, except for errors of law, unless the court finds that the order of the commission is not supported by substantial evidence, is contrary to the manifest weight of the evidence, is in excess of the statutory authority or jurisdiction of the commission, or violates constitutional rights.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 467, § 28, eff from and after January 3, 1984. [See Editor’s Note, below].

§ 77-3-73.
Appealed commission matters to take preference in all courts.

All commission matters appealed to any court shall take preference over other cases as a matter affecting the public interest, and all courts shall docket and dispose of such causes at the earliest moment compatible with the ends of justice.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7716-29; Laws, 1956, ch. 372, § 29.

§ 77-3-75.
Enforcement of commission orders.

The commission may apply to the chancery court, First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, for enforcement, by mandamus, injunction or other appropriate remedy, of any order of the commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7716-30; Laws, 1956, ch. 372, § 30.

§ 77-3-77.
Burden of proof on party seeking to vacate commission order.

In all actions and proceedings arising under the provisions of this article or growing out of the exercise of the authority and powers herein granted to the commission, the burden of proof shall be on the party seeking to vacate an order of said commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7716-31; Laws, 1956, ch. 372, § 31.

§ 77-3-79.
Reports by utilities; inspection of records; filing deadlines; penalties.

The commission may require, by order served on any public utility in the manner provided in this chapter for the service of orders, the filing of such relevant reports, information or data at such time and place as it may reasonably designate.

The commission shall at all reasonable times have access to and the right to inspect and examine all accounts, records, memoranda and property of the public utilities, and it shall be the duty of such public utilities to furnish to the commission, within such reasonable time as the commission may order, any information with respect thereto which the commission may by order require, including copies of maps, contracts, reports of engineers, and other data, records and papers, and to grant to all agents of the commission free access to its property and accounts, records and memoranda when requested so to do. It shall be unlawful for any member, officer, agent or employee of the commission knowingly and willingly to divulge any fact or information which may come to his knowledge during the course of any examination or inspection made under authority of this chapter, except as he may be directed by the commission or by a court or a judge thereof.

The commission shall require an annual reporting from each public utility, the rates of which are subject to regulation under the provisions of this chapter, of all its expenditures for business gifts and entertainment, and institutional, consumption-inducing and other advertising or public relations expenses which the utility claims should be allowed for rate-making purposes. The commission shall not allow as costs or expenses for rate-making purposes any of these expenditures which the commission determines not to be in the public interest. The cost of legislative-advocacy expenses shall not in any case be allowed as costs or expenses for rate-making purposes. Reasonable charitable or civic contributions shall be allowed as cost of service not to exceed amounts established by regulations adopted by the commission.

The commission shall establish filing deadlines for any required periodical reports but in no event shall the filing of such reports exceed sixty (60) days from the due date established by the commission. The commission shall have the authority to extend by order the time of compliance upon a finding that a matter of great urgency exists which would make compliance inequitable. The order extending the time for compliance shall fully set forth the facts justifying such extension. Any public utility which does not furnish such reports, information or other data by the deadlines established by the commission or within the extended time authorized by the commission shall be fined not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) per day for each day in violation of the requirements herein that such reports, information or other data are not furnished to the commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7716-20; Laws, 1956, ch. 372, § 20; Laws, 1983, ch. 467, § 29; Laws, 1990, ch. 513, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 2, 1990).

§ 77-3-81.
Violations of article or orders of commission; furnishing to commission of false testimony, reports, records, etc.

Any person or corporation which willfully and knowingly violates any provision of this article or which fails, omits or neglects to obey, observe or comply with any lawful order, or any part or provision thereof, of the commission shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be subject to a fine of not more than Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00), which shall be deposited in the State General Fund.

Every violation of the provisions of this article or of any lawful order of the commission, or any part or portion thereof by any corporation or person is a separate and distinct offense, and in case of a continuing violation after a first conviction, each day’s continuance thereof shall be deemed to be a separate and distinct offense.

Any person who knowingly or intentionally gives false testimony at any hearing held by the commission, a commissioner or a hearing examiner, or who knowingly or intentionally makes false reports to the commission, when the testimony and reports are required by this article or any lawful order or rule of the commission, or who knowingly or intentionally makes any false entries upon the books or records of any public utility subject to review by the commission, or who knowingly or intentionally makes or preserves any false or misleading vouchers, memoranda or records showing the nature of, or purpose for, the disbursement of funds of such public utilities, shall be deemed guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be committed to the custody of the State Department of Corrections for a period of not less than one (1) year nor more than ten (10) years for every offense.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 7716-32, 7716-33; Laws, 1956, ch. 372, §§ 32, 33; Laws, 1991, ch. 562, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 2, 1991).

§ 77-3-83.
Penalties are cumulative.

All penalties accruing under this article shall be cumulative, and a suit for the recovery of one penalty shall not be a bar to or affect the recovery of any other penalty or forfeiture or be a bar to any criminal prosecution against any public utility or any officer, director, agent or employee thereof or any other corporation or person.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7716-34; Laws, 1956, ch. 372, § 34.

§ 77-3-85.
Jurisdiction of actions to recover penalties and criminal prosecutions; limitation of actions.

Actions to recover penalties under this article, and criminal prosecutions under subsection (2) of Section 77-3-81, shall be brought in the name of the State of Mississippi in any court of competent jurisdiction. No action for penalty under subsection (1) of Section 77-3-81 may be maintained after the expiration of one (1) year from the date of the act of which complaint is made.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7716-35; Laws, 1956, ch. 372, § 35; Laws, 1991, ch. 562, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 1991).

§ 77-3-87.
Utilities taxed for expense of regulation by commission; collection of tax; adjustment of tax rate; funding of agency expenses; deposit of monies into State General Fund.

All reasonable and necessary expenses of the administration of the duties imposed on the public utilities staff and on the commission by Title 77, Mississippi Code of 1972, excluding the reasonable and necessary expenses of the administration and enforcement by the commission of the laws of this state pursuant to Chapters 7 and 9, Title 77, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall be provided as follows: There is hereby levied a tax upon (a) all utilities, the rates of which are subject to regulation by the provisions of this chapter and upon (b) all utilities not subject to such rate regulation which furnish to the ultimate consumer utility services of the type described by subparagraph (i) of paragraph (d) of Section 77-3-3 and otherwise subject to regulation by the provisions of this chapter, such levy to be effective on the first day of each year and to be calculated as follows: The rate of the tax shall be one hundred sixty-four thousandths of one percent (164/1000 of 1%) per year, of the gross revenues from the intrastate operations of the utilities taxed under this section. The rate of the tax for electric power associations and rural electrification authorities shall be ninety thousandths of one percent (90/1000 of 1%) per year of the gross revenues from the intrastate operations of electric power associations and rural electrification authorities taxed under this section. Effective July 1, 2017, the sum of all taxes levied by this section shall not exceed the total legislative appropriation of monies for the Public Utilities staff and the Public Service Commission for the ensuing fiscal year. The commission and the executive director of the public utilities staff shall certify to the Department of Revenue the amount of legislative appropriations of monies for the regulation of utilities. The Department of Revenue shall adjust the tax rates on a pro rata basis to generate the necessary revenues established by such legislative appropriations. Each utility which is subject to the tax levied by this section shall file a statement of its gross revenue by April 1 of each year showing the gross revenue for the preceding year’s operation. These statements of gross revenue shall be filed with the Department of Revenue on forms prescribed and furnished by the Department of Revenue. The Department of Revenue shall file a copy of these statements of gross revenue with the public utilities staff and the commission. The Department of Revenue shall calculate the amount of tax to be paid by each of the utilities and shall submit a statement thereof to the respective utilities, and the amount shown due in the statements to the utilities shall be paid by them within thirty (30) days thereafter to the Department of Revenue. The Department of Revenue shall furnish the public utilities staff and the commission with an itemized list showing gross and net revenues, assessments, tax collections and other related information for the respective utilities. The Department of Revenue shall deposit these funds into the General Fund if the State Treasury on the same day collected.

All administrative provisions of the Mississippi Sales Tax Law, including those which fix damages, penalties and interest for nonpayment of taxes and for noncompliance with the provisions of such chapter, and all other duties and requirements imposed upon taxpayers, shall apply to all persons liable for taxes under the provisions of this chapter, and the Commissioner of Revenue shall exercise all the power and authority and perform all the duties with respect to taxpayers under this chapter as are provided in the Mississippi Sales Tax Law except where there is a conflict, then the provisions of this chapter shall control. The term “gross revenue ” as used in this section is the total amount of all revenue derived by each of the utilities from its intrastate operations, which are subject to rate regulation under the provisions of this chapter or which constitute utility services of the type described by subparagraph (i) of paragraph (d) of Section 77-3-3 and which are regulated by this chapter and furnished to ultimate consumers. The Department of Revenue is hereby authorized to use all tax returns of any utilities available to it and to make audits as may be deemed necessary of all records of utilities in order to correctly determine the amount of such gross revenue.

All proceeds of the above-mentioned tax are hereby allocated to the public utilities staff and to the commission in the manner provided in this section for the purpose of this chapter.

Each utility subject to the provisions of this section shall be allowed to recover, through the use of a rate adjustment clause or rider, the total amount of taxes paid by the utility pursuant to this section for the reasonable and necessary expenses of the commission and the public utilities staff.

From and after July 1, 2016, the expenses of this agency shall be defrayed by appropriation from the State General Fund and all user charges and fees authorized under this section shall be deposited into the State General Fund as authorized by law.

From and after July 1, 2016, no state agency shall charge another state agency a fee, assessment, rent or other charge for services or resources received by authority of this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7716-36; Laws, 1956, ch. 372, § 36; Laws, 1966, ch. 626, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 505, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 427, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 443, § 1; Laws, 1974, ch. 369; Laws, 1977, ch. 436; Laws, 1980, ch. 559, § 1; Laws, 1983, ch. 467, § 30; Laws, 1984, ch. 478, § 31; Laws, 1987, ch. 343, § 6; Laws, 1991, ch. 525, § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 517, § 1; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1993, ch. 537, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 458, § 4; Laws, 2000, ch. 613, § 1; Laws, 2016, ch. 459, § 48; Laws, 2017, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 7, § 38, eff from and after passage (approved June 23, 2017).

§ 77-3-89.
Payment of expenses; audit of books and accounts; Public Utilities Staff Regulation Fund; funding of agency expenses; deposit of monies into State General Fund.

It shall be the duty of the State Auditor to advise the commission of the amount of money on hand in the “Public Service Commission Regulation Fund” from time to time. All expenses of the commission authorized by this article, or any other act of the Legislature, shall be paid by the State Treasurer upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer, which warrants shall be issued upon requisition signed by the chairman of the commission and countersigned by one (1) of the commissioners. Said requisition shall show upon its face the purpose for which the payment is being made by reference to the minute book in which such payment was authorized. It shall be unlawful for any person to withdraw any money from said fund other than by requisition issued as herein provided. A record of all requisitions issued by the commission showing to whom, for what purpose, and date issued, shall be placed upon the minute books of the commission and shall become a part of the official record of the commission.

The books and accounts of the commission shall be audited at the end of each fiscal year, and at any other time deemed necessary, by the State Auditor and a copy of such audits shall be furnished to the Governor and the commission. The State Auditor may prescribe such further accounting procedure as he deems necessary for the withdrawal of funds by the commission from said special fund. All requisitions drawn in compliance with this article shall be honored by the State Auditor and the funds disbursed in accordance therewith. The commission shall file a report at each regular session of the Legislature showing the expenditure of all funds by the commission.

The “Public Utilities Staff Regulation Fund” shall be administered in accordance with Section 77-2-19.

From and after July 1, 2016, the expenses of this agency shall be defrayed by appropriation from the State General Fund and all user charges and fees authorized under this section shall be deposited into the State General Fund as authorized by law.

From and after July 1, 2016, no state agency shall charge another state agency a fee, assessment, rent or other charge for services or resources received by authority of this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7716-36; Laws, 1956, ch. 372, § 36; Laws, 1966, ch. 626, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 505, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 427, § 1; Laws, 1987, ch. 343, § 7; Laws, 1991, ch. 525, § 6; Laws, 2016, ch. 459, § 54, eff from and after July 1, 2016.